test/src/morphology/V-isda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - isda - do ok : # 
     isda+V+Inf: isda
     isda+V+Hab+Neg+Prs: isdagangqanggan
     isda+V+Hab+Neg+Prs: isdagangqanggan
     isda+V+Hab+Neg+Prt: isdagangqangang
     isda+V+Hab+Neg+Fut: isdagangqangsaang
     isda+V+Neg+Prs: isdaqanggan
     isda+V+Neg+Prt: isdaqangang
     isda+V+Neg+Fut: isdaqangsaang
     isda+V+Hab+Prs: isdaganggan
     isda+V+Hab+Prt: isdagangang
     isda+V+Hab+Fut: isdagangsaang
     isda+V+Hab+Neg+Prs: isdagangqanggan
     isda+V+Hab+Neg+Prt: isdagangqangang
     isda+V+Hab+Neg+Fut: isdagangqangsaang
